Hawaii, session 2025, GM1267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that in the month of
2 September, Queen Liliuokalani's birth, life, and legacy is
3 remembered and celebrated in the Hawaiian community, including
4 at churches and Hawaiian organizations, such as Kawaiahao
5 Church's Alii Sunday, the Liliuokalani Trust Kipuka (children
6 centers), and the Kamehameha Schools.
7 The legislature further finds that the Hawaii Ponoi
8 Coalition was formed in 2007 to educate residents and visitors
9 to the islands on Hawaii's history, the Native Hawaiian people,
10 and the culture that makes Hawaii a place like no other. In
11 September 2007, the Coalition launched a commemorative event on
12 the grounds of lolani Palace to celebrate the birthday of Queen
13 Liliuokalani.
14 The legislature concludes that designating September as
15 Hawaiian History Month would be an appropriate way to honor
16 Queen Liliuokalani and recognize the contributions of the Native
2025-2902 SB1051 CDl SMA.docx

Page 2 1051
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
1 Hawaiian community, while also providing community building,
2 educational, and economic opportunities.
3 Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to designate
4 September as Hawaiian History Month.
S SECTION 2. Chapter 8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
6 by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to
7 read as follows:
8 ”§8- Hawaiian History Month. The month of September
9 shall be known and designated as "Hawaiian History Month" to
10 promote public awareness of Hawaii's history, honor Queen
11 Liliuokalani, and recognize the contributions of the Native
12 Hawaiian community. This month is not and shall not be
13 construed as a state holiday."
14 SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
15 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2902 SB1051 CDl SMA.docx

S.B. NO. Jg’
1
1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of June ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HA WAI'I

S.B. No. 1051, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai'i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
91

SB No. 1051, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives